Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3804
Prepaid dental service plan; certificate of authority; exception.

No person may offer a prepaid dental service plan in this state unless authorized to do so by the director. This section shall not apply to any person issuing group policies if fewer than twenty-five percent of the certificate holders or insureds reside in this state and the person is regulated to a comparable extent by another state in which a larger number of certificate holders or insureds reside.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 4;

Laws 1989, LB 92, § 240.